Utah statutes.
53C-4-304.   Public land grants -- Transcription of selected lands to be sent to county recorders.

(1)  The director shall receive clear lists to lands in this state from the Department of the Interior.

(2)  Within 90 days of receipt, the director shall transmit to the county recorders a certified transcript of all lands within their respective counties selected and approved for this state under federal law.

(3)  The county recorder shall immediately, upon receipt of the certified transcripts, enter them in the records of the recorder's office.

(4)  Any certified transcript required by this section, when recorded, shall be accepted in lieu of the original approved lists, and shall be sufficient evidence of the conveyance of the lands described in it by the United States to the state.



Enacted by Chapter 294, 1994 General Session

